Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-167.01
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that every year hundreds of people, many of them teenagers, are seriously injured or killed as a result of alcohol-related accidents. In recognition of such facts it is the intent of the Legislature, through the implementation of section 53-167.02, to protect the public health, safety, and welfare of all Nebraskans.

Laws 1993, LB 332, § 2.